Hawaii statutes.
[§346G-12] Termination.
(a) Collection of the hospital sustainability fee established by section
346G-5 shall be discontinued if:

(1) The required federal approvals specified in section
346G‑7 are not granted or are revoked by
the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services;

(2) The department reduces funding for hospital
services below the state appropriation in effect as of July 1, 2012;

(3) The department or any other state agency uses the
money in the hospital sustainability program special fund for any use other
than the uses permitted by this chapter; or

(4) Federal financial participation to match the
revenue from the hospital sustainability fee becomes unavailable under federal
law; provided that the department shall terminate the imposition of the
hospital sustainability fee beginning on the date the federal statutory,
regulatory, or interpretive change takes effect.

(b) Notwithstanding section 346G-4(c), if
collection of the hospital sustainability fee is discontinued as provided in
this section, any remaining moneys in the hospital sustainability program
special fund shall be distributed within thirty days to the private hospitals on
the same basis as the hospital sustainability fee was collected. [L 2012, c
217, pt of §2, §5; am L 2013, c 141, pt of §1, §2; am L 2014, c 123, §2; am L
2015, c 70, §2]

Revision Note

In subsection (a)(2), "July 1, 2012" substituted
for "the effective date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next